Utah statutes.
76-10-1207.5.   Exemption -- Corrections treatment, programs.

This part does not apply to the Department of Corrections or any treatment program by or under contract with the department when the use of sexually explicit material that is pornographic is limited to the assessment or treatment of an offender as defined under Section 64-13-1.



Enacted by Chapter 138, 1990 General Session

